Louisiana, session 2026, HB1209.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 30:961 is hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§961. Cooperative endeavor agreements; withdrawal of surface water; intent
A. Legislative intent and findings
(1) The legislature hereby finds and declares that the surface waters of the
state of Louisiana are among its most valuable natural resources and are essential to
the state's economy, environment, public safety, and quality of life.
(2) The legislature further finds that the responsible management of surface
water resources requires a balanced approach that supports economic development
while ensuring the long-term sustainability and usability of the state's waterways.
(3) The legislature recognizes that invasive aquatic vegetation and species
including but not limited to giant salvinia, water hyacinth, and hydrilla pose a
significant and growing threat to Louisiana's lakes, rivers, and other water bodies by
impairing navigation, increasing flood risk, degrading wildlife habitat, and limiting
public access.
Page 1 of 9
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-2654 REENGROSSED
HB NO. 1209
(4) The legislature further finds that aquatic vegetation overgrowth and
invasive species infestations can render water bodies unusable for commerce,
recreation, and resource management if not effectively controlled.
(5) Therefore, it is the intent of the legislature to:
(a) Ensure that the use and withdrawal of surface water resources contributes
to the preservation and maintenance of those resources.
(b) Support a statewide, coordinated approach to aquatic vegetation
management and invasive species control.
(c) Provide for research, monitoring, and long-term management strategies
to address invasive aquatic species.
(d) Establish sustainable funding mechanisms to assist in the protection and
restoration of Louisiana's waterways for the benefit of present and future
generations.
B. As provided by this Chapter and except as otherwise provided by law, a
person or entity may enter into a cooperative endeavor agreement to withdraw
running surface water as described in this Chapter. The cooperative endeavor
agreement shall prohibit the resale of withdrawn running surface water for a price
greater than provided for in the agreement; however, a person or entity may receive
compensation for the transportation, manufacturing, or processing of withdrawn
running surface water. Unless otherwise provided by law, all cooperative endeavor
agreements to withdraw running surface water, and any assignment of such
agreement, shall be approved by the secretary as provided in this Chapter. No
provision contained in this Chapter should be construed as a requirement for any
person or entity to enter into any cooperative endeavor agreement to withdraw
running surface water. This Chapter shall have no effect on the rights provided for
in Civil Code Articles 657 and 658 or any rights held by riparian owners in
accordance with the laws of this state. It is also the intent of the legislature that
should any portion of this Chapter be found to be unconstitutional that the remaining
parts shall continue in force and effect.
Page 2 of 9
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-2654 REENGROSSED
HB NO. 1209
B. C. No agency or subdivision of the state otherwise authorized to enter into
a cooperative endeavor agreement to withdraw running surface water, or assignment
of such shall do so unless the agreement is in writing, provides for fair market value
to the state, is in the public interest, and is contained on a uniform form developed
and prescribed by the State Mineral and Energy Board and approved by the attorney
general. Except when water is withdrawn from bodies of water managed by the
Department of Wildlife and Fisheries and determined by the office of fisheries to be
negatively impacted by invasive aquatic vegetation, fair market value to the state
shall include but not be limited to the economic development, employment, and
increased tax revenues created by the activities associated with the withdrawal of
running surface water. No such cooperative endeavor agreement to withdraw
running surface water shall be valid unless and until such agreement is approved by
the secretary following the submission of an application for approval, which the
secretary shall develop and prescribe. The secretary shall conduct the evaluation
provided for in Subsection D E of this Section and take action on the application
within sixty days of the application being deemed complete. If the secretary denies
the application, the secretary shall provide written reasons for the denial at the time
of the denial.
C. D. Unless otherwise provided by law, the secretary is authorized to enter
into any cooperative endeavor agreement to withdraw running surface water,
provided that any such agreement complies with the prohibition against gratuitous
donation of state property by ensuring that the state receives fair market value for
any water removed, and the substance of the agreement is contained within a written
cooperative endeavor agreement as provided for in Article VII, Section 14 of the
Constitution of Louisiana.
D. E. The secretary shall evaluate each application for a cooperative
endeavor agreement to withdraw running surface water and each such cooperative
endeavor that he may enter to ensure that each is in the public interest. The secretary
shall ensure the proposed agreement is based on best management practices and
Page 3 of 9
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-2654 REENGROSSED
HB NO. 1209
sound science, and is consistent with the required balancing of environmental and
ecological impacts with the economic and social benefits found in Article IX,
Section 1 of the Constitution of Louisiana. In his evaluation, the secretary shall also
ensure that all cooperative endeavor agreements to withdraw running surface water,
or assignments of such, adequately consider the potential and real effects of such
contracted activity on the sustainability of the water body and on navigation. Any
assignment of any such cooperative endeavor agreement to withdraw running surface
water may be approved by the secretary in the same manner as an agreement as
provided in this Section, unless otherwise provided for by law.
E. F.(1) A cooperative endeavor agreement to withdraw running surface
water, or an assignment of such, entered into pursuant to the provisions of this
Chapter shall have an initial term not to exceed two years. No new cooperative
endeavor agreement shall be entered into for any application that was received by the
department after December 31, 2027; however, except as otherwise provided in this
Subsection, Existing existing agreements may be renewed in two-year increments
but shall terminate no later than December 31, 2036.
(2) A person or entity who has entered into a cooperative endeavor
agreement to withdraw running surface waters or has obtained an assignment of
such, may terminate such agreement after December 31, 2022 2028. In order to be
effective, the person or entity seeking to terminate shall provide written notice by
certified mail to the secretary at least thirty days prior to termination.
F. G. The secretary may act to protect the natural resources of the state by
reducing any withdrawal of water from the running surface waters of the state
otherwise agreed to be withdrawn pursuant to an agreement entered into pursuant to
this Chapter, or make other conditions, including the suspension or termination of
such withdrawal of water when such an action is required to protect the resource and
to maintain sustainability and environmental and ecological balance. If the secretary
acts to reduce or suspend the volume of water agreed to be withdrawn, he shall do
so in such a manner that the total necessary reductions are proportionally borne by
Page 4 of 9
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-2654 REENGROSSED
HB NO. 1209
all users of the running surface waters, subject to this Chapter, in the area for which
a reduction is required. Prior to approval, the secretary shall ensure that each
contract or agreement or assignment thereof that involved the withdrawal of the
running surface waters of the state provides for the secretary's authority, without
liability for damages, in this regard.
G. H.(1) The secretary, in deciding whether to approve or require changes
in an application for a cooperative endeavor agreement to withdraw running surface
water, or assignment of such, shall consider the various existing and potential users
of the resource and shall give appropriate consideration and priority to the following
users or uses in the following order of priority:
(a) Human consumption by means of a public water system or a private water
system that provides domestic potable water service.
(b) Agricultural uses that provide sustenance to animals or irrigation to
plants.
(c) Any commercial purpose or other industrial or mining activity.
(2) The secretary shall also consider the impact of any proposed contract,
agreement, assignment, or use on resource planning. By way of illustration but not
limitation, these would include any potential project or use that impacts:
(a) Stream or water flow energy.
(b) Sediment load and distribution.
(c) Navigation.
(d) Aquatic life.
(e) Other vegetation or wildlife.
(3) In addition to the considerations contained in Paragraph (2) of this
Subsection, the secretary shall account for the effect of any proposed contract,
agreement, or project on the presence, proliferation, management, control,
mitigation, and potential eradication of invasive aquatic vegetation and species
including but not limited to giant salvinia, water hyacinth, hydrilla, alligator weed,
Page 5 of 9
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-2654 REENGROSSED
HB NO. 1209
and other invasive or noxious aquatic plants or organisms that may impair water
flow, navigation, flood control, ecological balance, or public use of state waters.
(3) (4) The management of cooperative endeavor agreements to withdraw
running surface water shall be consistent with the comprehensive master plan for
coastal restoration and protection as approved by the Coastal Protection and
Restoration Authority Board and the legislature.
H. I. Approval of an application for a cooperative endeavor agreement to
withdraw running surface water or assignment of such pursuant to this Chapter does
not obviate the need for other permits or authorizations required by law for any
proposed activity.
I. J. Any cooperative endeavor agreement approved or entered into by the
secretary pursuant to the Section which provides for the withdrawal of running
surface water for use outside the boundaries of the state of Louisiana shall require
the approval of the House Committee on Natural Resources and Environment and
the Senate Committee on Natural Resources. In determining whether to approve
such agreement, the committees shall consider the reasonableness of the withdrawal,
whether the withdrawal is contrary to the conservation and uses of the running
surface water, and whether the withdrawal is detrimental to the environment or the
public welfare.
J. K. The state shall be reimbursed at fair market value for all use or
withdrawal of running surface water from bodies of water managed by the
Department of Wildlife and Fisheries and determined by the office of fisheries to be
negatively impacted by invasive aquatic vegetation. Fair market value as used in this
Subsection shall be at a rate of not more than fifteen cents per thousand gallons, and
shall not include the economic development, employment, and increased tax
revenues created by the activities associated with the withdrawal of running surface
water.
K. L. All monies collected by the state pursuant to this Chapter as a result
of the use or withdrawal of surface water shall be deposited into the Aquatic Plant
Page 6 of 9
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-2654 REENGROSSED
HB NO. 1209
Control Dedicated Fund Account as established in R.S. 56:10.1, and shall be used
for the treatment of aquatic weed, preferably on the body of water from which
revenues were generated and shall be used for the management, control, mitigation,
and eradication of invasive aquatic vegetation and species throughout the state, as
determined by the Department of Wildlife and Fisheries based on priority need and
scientific assessment.
M. The secretary shall submit an annual report to the House Committee on
Natural Resources and Environment and the Senate Committee on Natural Resources
no later than March 1st of each year, which shall include:
(1) The number of active cooperative endeavor agreements.
(2) The volume of water authorized under each agreement and the volume
of water actually withdrawn.
(3) The total revenue generated under the agreement, including monetary and
nonmonetary consideration and a description of any nonmonetary consideration.
(4) The amount of monetary revenue deposited into the Aquatic Plant
Control Dedicated Fund Account.
(5) A summary of expenditures for aquatic vegetation management.
(6) An identification of any agreements utilizing nonmonetary consideration.